California statutes. Education Code
At the time and place designated in the notice for hearing the petition, or at any subsequent time to which the hearing may be postponed, the supervisors shall hear any reasons that may be submitted for or against the granting of the petition, and if they deem it for the best interests of the library district named in the petition that the unsold bonds be canceled, they shall make and enter an order in the minutes of their proceedings that the unsold bonds be canceled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18553.

Thereupon the bonds and the vote by which they were authorized to be issued, shall cease to be of any validity whatever.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14.5. Sale of Unsold Bonds [18555. - 18558.]

18555.

When the board of trustees of the library district determines that the purpose and object of the bonds has been accomplished, it may request the board of supervisors to cause any unsold bonds to be issued and sold and the proceeds thereof used for any or all of the purposes set forth in Section 18510.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

18556.

Upon receiving the request, signed by a majority of the members of the board of trustees, the supervisors shall fix a time for hearing the request, which shall not be more than 30 days thereafter, and shall cause a notice, stating the time and place of hearing, and the object of the request in general terms, to be published for 10 days prior to the day of hearing in a newspaper published in the library district, if there is one, and if there is no newspaper published in the library district, then in a newspaper published at the county seat of the county in which the library district or part thereof is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

18557.

At the time and place designated in the notice for hearing the request, or at any subsequent time to which the hearing may be postponed, the supervisors shall hear any reasons that may be submitted for or against the granting of the request. If, before the conclusion of the hearing, a petition signed by registered voters within the district equal to not less than 10 percent of the vote cast within the boundaries of the district for all candidates for governor at the last gubernatorial election requesting an election is not filed, the board of supervisors may, if they determine it to be for the best interests of the library district, grant the request. In such event, they shall make and enter an order in the minutes of their proceedings that the unsold bonds shall be sold and the proceeds used for the purposes specified in the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

18558.

In the event a petition, as set forth in Section 18557, is filed, the board of supervisors shall not grant the request without first submitting the question to the voters in the same manner and with the same effect as provided for a referendum by the electors of a district pursuant to Section 9340 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Tax for Interest and Redemption of Bonds [18560. - 18562.]

18560.

The board of supervisors, at the time of making a levy of taxes for county purposes, shall levy a tax for that year upon the taxable property in the district, at the equalized assessed value thereof for that year, for the interest and redemption of the bonds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18561.

The tax shall not be less than sufficient to pay the interest of the bonds for that year, and such portion of the principal as is to become due during the year. In any event the tax shall be high enough to raise, annually, for the first half of the term the bonds have to run, a sufficient sum to pay the interest thereon, and, during the balance of the term, high enough to pay the annual interest, and to pay annually, a proportion of the principal of the bonds equal to a sum produced by taking the whole amount of the bonds outstanding and dividing it by the number of years the bonds then have to run.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18562.

All money levied, when collected, shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the library district, and be used for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds, and for no other purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Payment of Interest and Bonds [18570. - 18571.]

18570.

The principal and interest on the bonds shall be paid by the county treasurer, upon the warrant of the county auditor, out of the fund provided therefor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18571.

The county auditor shall cancel and file with the county treasurer the bonds and coupons as rapidly as they are paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. California Library Services Act [18700. - 18767.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [18700. - 18703.]

18700.

This chapter shall be known as the California Library Services Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1255.)
-------------------------------------------

18701.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the interest of the people of the state to ensure that all people have free and convenient access to all library resources and services that might enrich their lives, regardless of where they live or of the tax base of their local government. This finding is based on the recognition that:

(a) The public library is a primary source of information, recreation, and education to persons of all ages, any location, or any economic circumstance.

(b) The expansion of knowledge and the increasing complexity of our society creates a need for materials and information that goes beyond the ability of any
 one library to provide.

(c) The public libraries of California are supported primarily by local taxes. The ability of local governments to provide adequate service is dependent on the taxable wealth of each local jurisdiction and varies widely throughout the state.

(d) Public libraries are unable to bear the greater costs of meeting the exceptional needs of many residents, including people with disabilities, non-English-speaking and limited-English-speaking persons, those who are confined to home or in an institution, and those who are economically disadvantaged.

(e) The effective sharing of resources and services among the libraries of California requires an ongoing commitment by the state to promote access to information in both print and digital format.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 1.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18702.

It is the intent of the Legislature to provide all residents with the opportunity to obtain from their public libraries needed materials and informational services by facilitating access to the resources of all libraries in this state.

This policy shall be accomplished by assisting public libraries to improve service to the underserved of all ages, and by enabling public libraries to provide their users with the services and resources of all libraries in this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1255.)
-------------------------------------------

18703.

In adopting this chapter, the Legislature declares that its policy shall be as follows:

(a) To reaffirm the principle of local control of the government and administration of public libraries, and to affirm that the provisions of this chapter apply only to libraries authorized by their jurisdictions to apply to participate in the programs authorized by this act.

(b) To require no library, as a condition for receiving funds or services under this chapter, to acquire or exclude any specific book, periodical, film, recording, picture, or other material, or any specific equipment, or to acquire or exclude any classification of books or other
 material by author, subject matter, or type.

(c) To encourage the adequate financing of libraries from local sources, with state aid to be furnished to supplement, not supplant, local funds.

(d) To encourage service to the underserved of all ages.

(e) To encourage and enable the sharing of resources between libraries.

(f) To ensure public participation in carrying out the intent of this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 2.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [18710. - 18710.]

18710.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings, unless the context otherwise indicates or unless specific exception is made:

(a) “Academic library” means a library established and maintained by a college or university to meet the needs of its students and faculty, and others by agreement.

(b) “Act” means the California Library Services Act.

(c) “Cooperative library system” means a public library system that consists of two or more jurisdictions entering into a written agreement to implement a regional program in accordance with this chapter, and that,
 as of the effective date of this chapter, was designated a library system under the Public Library Services Act of 1963 or was a successor to that library system.

(d) “Direct loan” means the lending of a book or other item directly to a borrower.

(e) “Equal access” means the right of the residents of jurisdictions that are members of a cooperative library system to use on an equal basis with one another the services and loan privileges of any and all other members of the same system.

(f) “Independent public library” means a public library that is not a member of a system.

(g) “Interlibrary loan” means the lending of a book or other item from one library to another as the result of a user request for the item.

(h) “Jurisdiction” means a county, city and county, city, or any district that is authorized by law to provide public library services and that operates a public library.

(i) “Libraries for institutionalized persons” means libraries maintained by institutions for the purpose of serving their resident populations.

(j) “Public library” means a library, or two or more libraries, that is operated by a single public jurisdiction and that serves its residents free of charge.

(k) “School library” means an organized collection of printed and audiovisual materials that satisfies all of the following criteria:

(1) Is administered as a unit.

(2) Is located in a designated place.

(3) Makes printed, audiovisual, and other materials as well as necessary equipment and services of a staff accessible to elementary and secondary school pupils and teachers.

 (l) “Special library” means one maintained by an association, government service, research institution, learned society, professional association, museum, business firm, industrial enterprise, chamber of commerce, or other organized group and the greater part of their collections being in a specific field or subject, such as natural sciences, economics, engineering, law, and history.

(m) “Special Services Programs” means a project establishing or improving service to the underserved of all ages.

(n) “State board” means the
 California Library Services Board.

(o) “System” means a cooperative library system.

(p) “Underserved” means any population segment with exceptional service needs not adequately met by traditional library service patterns, including, but not limited to, those persons who are geographically isolated, economically disadvantaged, functionally illiterate, of non-English-speaking or limited-English-speaking ability, homebound, or institutionalized, or who are persons with disabilities.

(q) “Universal borrowing” means the extension by a public library of its direct loan privileges to the eligible borrowers of all other public libraries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 3.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Administration [18720. - 18726.]

18720.

(a) There is hereby established in the state government the California Library Services Board, to consist of 13 members. The Governor shall appoint nine members of the board. Three of the Governor’s appointments shall be representative of laypersons, one of whom shall represent people with disabilities, one of whom shall represent limited- and non-English-speaking persons, and one of whom shall represent economically disadvantaged persons.

(b) The Governor shall also appoint six members of the board, each of whom shall represent one of the following categories: school libraries, libraries for institutionalized persons, public library trustees or commissioners, public libraries, special libraries, and academic libraries.

(c) The Legislature shall appoint the remaining four public members from persons who are not representative of categories mentioned in this section. Two shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules and two shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(d) The terms of office of members of the board shall be for four years and shall begin on January 1 of the year in which the respective terms are to start.

(e) On January 1, 2013, the members of the board shall be those persons serving on the former Library of California Board, appointed pursuant to former Section 18820, as it existed on December 31, 2012, who shall serve for the duration of their terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 30.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

18722.

The concurrence of seven members of the state board shall be necessary to the validity of any of its acts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1255.)
-------------------------------------------

18723.

Members of the state board shall serve without pay. They shall receive their actual and necessary traveling expenses while on official business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1255.)
-------------------------------------------

18724.

The duties of the state board shall be to adopt rules, regulations, and general policies for the implementation of this chapter. In addition, the state board, consistent with the terms and provisions of this chapter, shall have the following powers and duties:

(a) To direct the State Librarian in the administration of this chapter.

(b) To review for its approval all annual proposals submitted under this chapter.

(c) To expend the funds appropriated for the purpose of implementing the provisions of this chapter.

(d) To require participating libraries and systems to prepare and submit any reports and information that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, and to prescribe the form and manner for providing those reports and information.

(e) To require that any public library participating in programs authorized by this chapter provide access to its bibliographic records and materials location information consistent with the legislative policy of encouraging the sharing of resources between libraries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 4.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18725.

The state board shall serve as the State Advisory Council on Libraries for the purpose of meeting the requirements of the federal Library Services and Technology Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 219, Sec. 2.   (SB 1044)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

18726.

The State Librarian shall be the chief executive officer of the state board for purposes of this chapter and shall:

(a) Make such reports and recommendations as may be required by the state board.

(b) Administer the provisions of this chapter.

(c) Review all claims to insure programmatic and technical compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1255.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Local Public Library Services [18730. - 18731.]

18730.

Any public library or combination of public libraries may submit proposals to the state board for Special Services Programs within the service area. Applications shall identify the needs of the target service group, assess the capacity of the applicant library or libraries to respond to those needs, and shall identify the activities and timelines necessary to achieve those objectives. Funds may be expended for the development of collections to meet the needs of the underserved, together with the employment or retraining of staff necessary to properly utilize the collections, and to provide appropriate services to the underserved.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1255.)
-------------------------------------------

18731.

A California public library may participate in universal borrowing. A public library participating in universal borrowing shall not exclude the residents of any jurisdiction maintaining a public library.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 5.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Library System Services [18740. - 18747.]

18740.

A library system, eligible for funds under this article, may consist of the following systems:

(a) A cooperative library system that, as of the effective date of this act, was designated a system under the Public Library Services Act of 1963.

(b) A library system in which two or more systems consolidate to form a library system.

(c) A library system that is formed by adding independent public library jurisdictions to an existing system.

(d) A library system formed by any combination of the above.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

18743.

Each member library of a system shall provide equal access to all residents of the area served by the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 7.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18745.

Each system shall annually apply to the state board for funds for intrasystem communications and delivery and resource sharing. Proposals shall be based upon the most cost-effective methods of exchanging print and digital materials and information among the member libraries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 9.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18746.

Each system shall annually apply to the state board for funds for planning, coordination, and evaluation of the overall systemwide services authorized by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 107.)
-------------------------------------------

18747.

Each system shall establish an administrative council whose membership consists of the head librarians of each jurisdiction in the system. Duties of the administrative council shall include general administrative responsibility for the system, adopting a system plan of service, and submitting annual proposals to the state board for implementation of the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 219, Sec. 5.   (SB 1044)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Statewide Services [18760. - 18767.]

18760.

The state board shall establish and administer two or more state reference centers. The centers shall be responsible for answering reference requests that cannot be met by systems and libraries participating in the programs authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1255.)
-------------------------------------------

18761.

Each reference center established by the state shall provide statewide service. Such service shall include the handling of reference requests that cannot be met locally and regionally.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1255.)
-------------------------------------------

18762.

Each reference center established pursuant to Section 18760 may enter into reciprocal or contractual agreements with libraries or any other information source for the purpose of making available their materials and informational services for the benefit of the library users of this state. Each California public library participating in any program under this chapter shall make materials and services available, as needed, to state reference centers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1255.)
-------------------------------------------

18763.

The budget of any reference center established pursuant to Section 18760 may include funds for the general operations of such centers, including funds for collection development and use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1255.)
-------------------------------------------

18764.

The state board shall designate one or more of the reference centers established pursuant to Section 18760 as a repository for collections specially relevant to economically disadvantaged persons and non-English-speaki ng persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1255.)
-------------------------------------------

18766.

The state board shall establish and maintain a statewide communications and delivery and resource-sharing network between and among systems, state reference centers, independent public libraries, and all other libraries participating in the programs authorized by this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 12.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18767.

The state board shall establish and maintain a computerized data base of bibliographic records and locations of all materials acquired by public libraries in this state, for the purpose of carrying out the legislative policy of enabling libraries to share resources efficiently.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 331.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.6. California Library Literacy and English Acquisition Services Program [18880. - 18883.]

18880.

(a) The California Library Literacy and English Acquisition Services Program is hereby established within the California State Library as a public library program designed to reduce illiteracy among children and adults by providing English language literacy instruction and related services to native and nonnative English speaking youth and adults residing in California. For purposes of this article, “English language literacy instruction” means the development of basic skills of speaking, reading, and writing in the English language.

(b) The California State Library shall allocate funds appropriated in the Budget Act for the California Library Literacy and English Acquisition Services Program to local library jurisdictions that are effectively providing literacy services.

(c) At local discretion, jurisdictions may use their allocation from the State Literacy Program for any of the services described in Section 18881.

(d) The California State Library shall provide local jurisdictions with technical assistance to the extent that resources are available for this purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 573, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18881.

The California Library Literacy and English Acquisition Services Program for public libraries may be used for any of the following:

(a) (1) Services designed to reduce adult illiteracy by providing English language literacy instruction and related services to adults and youth who are not enrolled in school. A participating public library may establish an adult literacy instructional program that provides adult basic literacy instruction and related services. Participant learning shall be evaluated on the basis of statewide guidelines established by the State Librarian.

(2) The public library shall do all of the following in establishing and implementing the program:

(A) Seek community and local government awareness of and support for the program and develop a local commitment of resources for the program’s continuation.

(B) Develop cooperative relationships with other local literacy service providers and participate in existing community adult literacy coalitions, in order to address the wide variety of literacy needs of the community and ensure an effective utilization of resources. The public library shall assist in the establishment of a community adult literacy coalition if none currently exists.

(C) Recruit and train volunteers to provide tutoring and other services in public library and other community settings.

(D) Certify that the local jurisdiction will provide the same level of local and private fiscal support as it did in the preceding fiscal year.

(b) (1) Services to prevent illiteracy through coordinated literacy and preliteracy services to families that include illiterate adults and young children. The program shall provide reading preparation services for young children in public library settings and shall instruct parents in reading to their children. In addition, the program shall provide technical assistance, parent support, and any resources and materials necessary for its implementation.

(2) A public library implementing this service shall meet all of the following requirements:

(A) Offer new services to families with young children with the goal of helping the children become successful readers by increasing their general competence, self-confidence, and positive emotional associations with reading as a family experience and familiarity with the lifelong use of library resources. Recruitment of parents not previously included in public library literacy programs is a high priority.

(B) Families eligible for the program shall include, but not be limited to, those with young children up to the age of five years.

(C) Program meetings shall be held in public library settings.

(D) The public library literacy program staff and children’s services staff shall work in close coordination with the State Library in administering the program to assure maximum integration of literacy services to parents and preliteracy services to their children.

(3) Services offered by a public library under this subdivision shall include the following:

(A) Acquisition of books, of appropriate reading levels for, and containing subjects of interest to, children for ownership by young children of families participating in the program.

(B) Regular meetings of parents and children in public library settings during hours that are suitable for parents and their children.

(C) Storytelling, word games, and other exercises designed to promote enjoyment of reading in adults and children.

(D) Use of children’s books and language experience stories from the meetings as material for adult literacy instruction.

(E) Instruction for parents in book selection and reading aloud to children.

(F) Services to enhance full family participation and to foster a family environment conducive to reading.

(G) Assistance to parents in using services in order to access books and other materials on such topics as parenting, child care, health, nutrition, and family life education.

(H) Other services, as necessary to enable families to participate in the program.

(c) Services for pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and their families in local English language learner and literacy programs. Local libraries may offer year-round literacy and English language tutoring in collaboration with nonprofit and other local organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 573, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18883.

A local library shall ensure that funds received pursuant to this chapter are exclusively used for expenses resulting from providing English language and literacy services and shall ensure that at least 90 percent of the funds received for the program are expended on direct services and related materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 573, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Municipal Libraries [18900. - 18965.]



  ARTICLE 1. Establishment [18900. - 18901.]

18900.

The common council, board of trustees, or other legislative body of any city in the state may, and upon being requested to do so by one-fourth of the electors of the municipal corporation in the manner provided in this article, shall, by ordinance, establish in and for the municipality a public library if there is none already established therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.

The request may be by a single petition, or by several petitions. The several petitions shall be substantially in the same form. The single petition, or several petitions in the aggregate, shall have, the signatures of the requisite number of electors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Trustees [18910. - 18927.]

18910.

The public library shall be managed by a board of library trustees, consisting of five members, to be appointed by the mayor, president of the board of trustees, or other executive head of the municipality, with the consent of the legislative body of the municipality.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18911.

The trustees shall hold office for three years. The members of the first board appointed shall so classify themselves by lot that one of their number shall go out of office at the end of the current fiscal year, two at the end of one year thereafter, and two at the end of two years thereafter.

The legislative body of the municipality may, by ordinance, provide for the compensation of such trustees; provided that the respective compensation for such trustees shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50) per month.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18912.

Men and women are equally eligible to appointment as trustees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18913.

Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointments are made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18914.

Boards of library trustees shall meet at least once a month at such times and places as they may fix by resolution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18915.

Meetings of the board are governed by the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 343, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

18916.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18917.

The board shall appoint one of its number president, who shall serve for one year and until his successor is appointed, and in his absence shall select a president pro tem.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18918.

The board shall cause a proper record of its proceedings to be kept.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18919.

The board of library trustees may make and enforce all rules, regulations, and bylaws necessary for the administration, government, and protection of the libraries under its management, and all property belonging thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18920.

The board of library trustees may administer any trust declared or created for the library, and receive by gift, devise, or bequest and hold in trust or otherwise, property situated in this state or elsewhere, and where not otherwise provided, dispose of the property for the benefit of the library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18921.

The board of library trustees may prescribe the duties and powers of the librarian, secretary, and other officers and employees of the library; determine the number of and appoint all officers and employees, and fix their compensation. The officers and employees shall hold their offices or positions at the pleasure of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18922.

The board of library trustees may purchase necessary books, journals, publications, and other personal property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18923.

The board of library trustees may purchase real property, and erect or rent and equip, such buildings or rooms, as may be necessary, when in its judgment a suitable building, or portion thereof, has not been provided by the legislative body of the municipality for the library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18924.

The board of library trustees may request the appropriate state officials to furnish the library with copies of any and all reports, laws, and other publications of the state not otherwise disposed of by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18925.

The board of library trustees may borrow books from, lend books to, and exchange books with other libraries, and may allow nonresidents to borrow books upon such conditions as the board may prescribe.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18926.

The board of library trustees may do and perform any and all other acts and things necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18927.

The board of library trustees, or if there is no board of trustees, then the administrative head of the library shall, on or before August 31st, in each year, report to the legislative body of the municipality and to the State Librarian on the condition of the library, for the year ending the 30th day of June preceding. The reports shall, in addition to other matters deemed expedient by the board of trustees or administrative head of the library, contain such statistical and other information as is deemed desirable by the State Librarian. For this purpose the State Librarian may send to the several boards of trustees or administrative heads of the library instructions or question blanks so as to obtain the material for a comparative study of library conditions in the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Support of Libraries [18951. - 18953.]

18951.

All money acquired by gift, devise, bequest, or otherwise, for the purposes of the library, shall be apportioned to a fund to be designated the library fund, and shall be applied to the purposes authorized in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------

18952.

If payment into the treasury is inconsistent with the conditions or terms of any gift, devise, or bequest, the board shall provide for the safety and preservation of the fund, and the application thereof to the use of the library, in accordance with the terms and conditions of the gift, devise, or bequest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18953.

Payments from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued after due audit by, and an order from, the library trustees. The warrants shall be signed by the president and secretary of the board of library trustees. The treasurer of the municipality shall pay such warrants without any further order or warrant from any other authority.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Government [18960. - 18965.]

18960.

Every library established pursuant to this chapter shall be forever free to the inhabitants and nonresident taxpayers of the municipality, subject always to such rules, regulations, and bylaws as may be made by boards of library trustees. Any person who violates any rule, regulations, or bylaw may be fined or excluded from the privileges of the library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18961.

The board of library trustees and the legislative body of any neighboring municipality or the board of supervisors of the county in which the public library is situated, may contract for lending the books of the library to residents of the county or neighboring municipality, upon a reasonable compensation to be paid by the county or neighboring municipality.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18962.

The title to all property acquired for the purposes of the library, when not inconsistent with the terms of its acquisition, or otherwise designated, vests in the municipality in which the library is situated, and in the name of the municipal corporation may be sued for and defended by action at law or otherwise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18963.

Any municipal library which was established and existed on June 11, 1909, under the provisions of an act entitled “An act to establish free public libraries and reading rooms,” approved April 26, 1880, is continued under the provisions of this chapter and shall be considered the same as if established under the provisions of this chapter. This chapter has no application to any library established or governed by a city charter, and any city charter is in no manner affected by this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18964.

Any ordinance establishing a library adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be repealed by the body which adopted it upon being requested to do so by 51 percent of the electors of the municipal corporation, as shown by the great register. Upon the repeal of the ordinance the library is disestablished in the municipal corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

18965.

Whenever the governing bodies of two or more cities or counties consolidate their existing public library services, as a joint exercise of powers under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500), Division 7, Title 1 of the Government Code, and the ownership or management of the cities’ and counties’ library facilities and other library assets are turned over to a newly formed joint agency, any boards of public library trustees existing prior to the consolidation, may be dissolved by ordinance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. County Free Libraries [19100. - 19180.]



  ARTICLE 1. Establishment [19100. - 19116.]

19100.
